Nebraska, session 109, LB51.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1) In order to facilitate the authorized interstate exchange
of criminal history record information for noncriminal justice purposes, and to
implement the National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact, 34 U.S.C. 40316,
the Legislature approves and ratifies the compact. The Superintendent of Law
Enforcement and Public Safety shall execute the compact on behalf of the state.
(2) The Nebraska State Patrol is the repository of criminal history record
information for purposes of the compact and shall do all things necessary or
incidental to carrying out the compact.
(3) The Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety or the
superintendent's designee is the state's compact officer and shall administer
the compact within the state. The Nebraska State Patrol may adopt and
promulgates rules and regulations and establish procedures for the cooperative
exchange of criminal history record information between the state and federal
government for use in noncriminal justice cases.
(4) The state's ratification of the compact remains in effect until
legislation is enacted which specifically renounces the compact.
(5) This compact does not affect or abridge the obligations and
responsibilities of the Nebraska State Patrol under state law, including, but
not limited to, the Security, Privacy, and Dissemination of Criminal History
Information Act, and does not alter or amend the manner, direct or otherwise,
in which the public is afforded access to criminal history record information
under state law.
-1-